District of Columbia statutes.
46-353.06

Inappropriate tribunal.

If a petition or comparable pleading is received by an inappropriate tribunal of the District, the tribunal shall forward the pleading and accompanying documents to an appropriate tribunal of the District or of another state and notify the petitioner where and when the pleading was sent.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 306, 63 DCR 222